GRAMMARS/GERMAN/FST/src/XMORPH/rules-german.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst
# CONTENT:	German morphology : morphophonological rules
#
# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
#
# CREATED:     25-Jul-2003
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:	xfst -s LEX.fst -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================

# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> define special function characters

define MBD	"^+" ;	 # morpheme boundary

define UML	"^$" ;	 # umlaut trigger

define CBD1	"^#" ;	 # compound boundary 
			 # Schiff^#Fahrt -> Schiffahrt^Old, Schifffahrt^New

define CBD2	"^-" ;	 # hyphen boundary 
			 ## Schiff^-Fahrt -> Schiff-Fahrt

define FBD	"^/" ;	 # separator for "Fuge" (linking element)
			 ## Kind^/s^#Kopf -> Kindskopf

define DRS	"^}" ;	 # derivational affix
			 # trink^}bar 

define DRP	"^{" ;	 # derivational prefix
			 ## un^{treu

define CONV	"^]" ;	 # conversion marker
			 ## trinken+Verb+Inf^]+Noun+Neut

define SEP	"^=" ;	 # (lexical) marker for separable prefix
			 ## an^=kommen

define TBD	"^&" ;	 # (lexical) marker for contarcted tokens
			 ## zum => zu+Adpos+Prop^&dem+Det+Def...
			 ## geht's => gehen+Verb...^&es+Pron+Pers...

define DBL	"^~" ;	 # marker for doubling s or n 
			 ## Bus~^+e -> Busse; Freundin~^+e -> Freundinnen

define BAR	"^|" ;	 # marker for segment/word boundary 
			 ## Miss|erfolg -> Mißerfolg^Old; NOT: Misserfolg"^Old
			 ## Aus|stieg -> NOT: Außtieg^Old !

define DOT	"^." ;	 # marker for numeral coimpound
			 ## ein^.und^.zwanzig

define ACC	"^*" ;	 # word (accent) marker, to "block" some rules
			 ## penible^+e -> penible, finster^+e -> finstre
			 ## BUT: fidel*^+e -> fidele; schwer*^+e -> schwere

define SPACE	"^_" ;	 # white space
			 ## open_air
 
define DEL	[%^1|%^2|%^3] ;

define SPELL	"^Old" | "^New" | "^Err" ;

define CBD	CBD1 | CBD2 ;		# compound boundary
define BD	CBD | MBD | DRS ;
define EOW	(%-) .#. ;		# end of word

define LowVow	a | e | i | o | u | ä | ü | ö ;
define UppVow	A | E | I | O | U | Ä | Ü | Ö ; 
define Vowel	LowVow | UppVow ;
define LowCons	b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|y|z|ß ;
define UppCons	B|C|D|F|G|H|J|K|L|M|N|P|Q|R|S|T|V|W|X|Y|Z ;
define Cons	LowCons | UppCons ;

define NCons1	[ b | c h | c k | f f | g | d | m m | p | t ] ;
define NCons	NCons1 [m|n] ;


set flag-is-epsilon on

#########################################################################
set quit-on-fail off

# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> upper/lower case control for lexicalised compounds
## Baden[=]Württemberg		-> Baden-Württemberg
## Baden[=]Württember^}isch	-> baden-württembergisch

define LDASH	%- [ "@U.frm.upp@" 0:%^Upp | "@U.frm.low@" 0:%^Low ];
substitute defined LDASH for "[=]"

# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> spelling flag diacritics
define OLD	  "@U.lem.old@" "@U.srf.old@" ;
define NEW	  "@U.lem.new@" "@U.srf.new@" ;
define ERR	  "@U.lem.err@" "@U.srf.err@" ;
substitute defined OLD for "[old]"
substitute defined NEW for "[new]"
substitute defined ERR for "[err]"

# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> flag diacritics for compounds
# [*]	 ==> no compound
## Aber	 -> Aber, *-aber

# [&]	 ==> no single word, only compound head
## äugig -> (blau)-äugig, *äugig

# [-]	 ==> if compound, then only hyphenated
## Los_Angeles -> ?Nord-Los Angeles, *-Nordlos Angeles

# [^]	 ==> only hyphenated compound; no case change in derivations
## PC	 -> Standard-PC, PC-basiert, *pC-basiert

define CHEAD   "@R.cpd@" "@C.cpd@" ;
define CDASH   "@U.cpd.dsh@" "@C.cpd@" ;
define CDASH2  CDASH "^*" ;	       # no case change in derivations or compounds
define NOCP    "@U.cpd.no@" ;

substitute defined NOCP	 for "[*]"
substitute defined CHEAD for "[&]"
substitute defined CDASH for "[-]"
substitute defined CDASH2 for "[^]"
set quit-on-fail on

define LEX

# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> flag diacritics for verb control
# [P]	 marker for attached separable prefix	
#	 (enables all verb forms and derivations, except imperative)
##	 nach[P]ahmen -> nachahmen, nachgehamt, nachahmst, *nachahm!
# [S]	 marker for detached separable prefix
#	 (enables only finite verb forms and imperative)
##	 [S]ahmen -> ahme (nach)! 
# [G]	 "ge" infix for past particple
# [Z]	 "zu" unfix for infinitive and prsent participle

set flag-is-epsilon off

read regex [
	SEP  <- [ "[P]" | "[S]" ]
.o.	0   <- [ "[G]" | "[Z]" ]

.o.	LEX

.o.	"[S]" -> [ "@U.cpd.no@" "@U.sep.off@" "@P.ge.off@" SEP ]
.o.	"[P]" -> [ "@U.sep.on@" SEP ]
.o.	"[G]" -> [ "@P.ge.on@" g e | "@P.ge.off@" ] 
.o.	"[Z]" -> "@D.zu.on@" [ "@P.zu.on@" z u | "@P.zu.off@" ]
];

twosided flag-diacritics

set flag-is-epsilon on

echo >> map optional Vowels "e" and "a"
## d^arauf	 -> darauf :: darauf, drauf
## los^e	 -> lose   :: lose, los
## Asiat^E	 -> Asiat  :: Asiat, Asiate
define LEX 

read regex [
	0 <- %^E
.o.	e <- %^e
.o.	a <- %^a
.o.	0 <- "[_]"
.o.	LEX
.o.	[%^E|%^e] -> [0|e]
.o.	%^a -> [0|a]
.o.	"[_]" -> [" "|0]
];

define LEX 

#########################################################################
echo >>> identify tags and single characters
read regex LEX ;
single char sigma net
define SIG ;

read regex [ SIG .o. %+ ?+ ];
multi char sigma net 
define TAG 

read regex [ SIG .o. %^ ?+ ];
multi char sigma net 
define DIAC

read regex [SIG .o. "@" ?+ "@" ];
multi char sigma net 
define FLAG

define CHAR	SIG & ? ;

# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> basic clean up of upper side
read regex [
## Affe+Noun+Masc^}in -> Affe+Noun+Masc}in
## Wales+Prop+Country+Neut^2is^}er+Noun+Masc -> Wales+Prop+Country+Neut^}er+...
## Epos+Noun+Neut^2en+Pl..		     -> Epos+Noun+Neut+Pl...
	0 <- [ BAR | CHAR ]* || TAG _ [ TAG | DRS ]
.o.	0 <- [ DEL | UML | DBL | %^V ]
.o.	LEX 
];

# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> basic clean up of lower side
define LEX

read regex [
	LEX
# remove tags 
.o.	[ TAG | CONV ] -> 0

# cut infinitive endings
## knien^V...	-> knie...
## sammeln^V...	-> sammel...
## sichern^V...	-> sicher...
## spielen^V...	-> spiel...
.o.    (e) n @-> 0 || _ %^V
.o.    [..] -> e   || k n i _ %^V

# remove stem characters
.o.	CHAR   (DBL) %^1 @-> 0
.o.	CHAR^2 (DBL) %^2 @-> 0
.o.	CHAR^3 (DBL) %^3 @-> 0
];

# --------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> umlaut rule
define LEX
# Apfel^$		-> Äpfel
# kalt^$er		-> kälter
# Affe^$^}chen		-> Äffe^}chen
# Saal^$e		-> Säle
# Floß^$e		-> Flöße
# Ofen^$^}chen		-> Öfen^}chen
# Moor^$^}chen		-> ?Mör^}chen
# Fluss^$e		-> Flüsse
# Haus^$er		-> Häuser
# Bild^$er		-> Bilder

read regex	[
	LEX

.o.	A (a) @-> Ä, a (a) @-> ä	|| _ (u) Cons* (e (Cons)) UML
.o.	O (o) @-> Ö, o (o) @-> ö	|| _ Cons* (e (Cons)) UML
.o.	U -> Ü, u -> ü		|| [ \[e|a|ä|E|A|Ä] | .#. ] _ Cons* (e (Cons)) UML
.o.	UML -> 0
];

# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> derivational changes
define LEX

read regex [
	LEX 

# Technik^}isch	 -> technisch
# Magie^}isch -> magisch
.o.	i [e|k] -> 0 || _ DRS i s c h

# weise^}heit -> Weisheit
# müde^}igkeit -> Müdigkeit

# Biologie^}isch -> biologisch
# Bretone^}isch -> bretonisch
# Bote^}in -> Botin
# Karlsruhe^}Er -> Karlsruher
.o.	e -> 0 || _ DRS [ h e i t | Vowel ]


# sammel^V^}ung	 -> ?Sammelung, Sammlung
# sicher^V^}ung	 -> Sicherung, ?Sichrung
# Basel^}er -> Basler, Baseler
# wander^}er^}in -> Wandererin, Wanderin
# fummeln^}erei	 -> ?Fummelerei, Fummlerei, Fummelei
# klettern^}erei -> ?Klettererei, Klettrerei, Kletterei
.o.    e (->) 0 ||  Cons _ [l|r] %^V DRS Vowel
.o.    (DRS) e r (@->) 0 || \[i] e r _ DRS [i|I] n 
.o.    e r (->) 0 || \[i] e [l|r] DRS _ e i
.o.    e (->) 0 || \[i] _ [l|r] DRS e r

# Hase^$^}chen -> Häschen
# Faden^$^}chen -> Fädchen
.o.	e (n) @-> 0	|| _ DRS [(e l) {chen}|{lein}]

# Engel^}lein -> Engelein, Englein
# Schnabel^$^}lein -> Schnäbelein, Schnäblein
.o.	e l (->) 0	|| \[i] _ DRS {lein}
.o.	l -> 0		|| _ DRS {lein}

];


# ============================================================================
# rules-phon
# ============================================================================


# --------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> verbs ...
define LEX
read regex [
	LEX

# berechnen^V^}bar -> berechenbar
# berechnen^V^}ung -> Berechnung
# rechn^V^#Weg	   -> Rechen^#weg
# trockn^V^#	   -> trocken-
.o.    [..] -> e || NCons1 _  [m|n] %^V [DRS Cons | %^CpdE [ CBD | %- ] ]

# "e"in compound verb stems
## polier^V^CpdE	-> polier-
## bind^V^CpdE		-> binde-
## folg^V^CpdE		-> folge-, folg- 
## werb^V^CpdE		-> werbe-
## lös^V^CpdE		-> löse-
.o.	%^CpdE (->) e	|| [b|g|d|t| Vowel s ] %^V _
.o.	%^CpdE -> 0


# verbs in -el, -er
## sammel^V^+e		-> ?sammele, sammle
## sicher^V^+e		-> sichere, sichre
## sammel^V^+est	-> *sammelest, sammelst
## sicher^V^+est	-> *sicherest, sicherst
## BUT: teer^V^+e	-> teere, *tere
## BUT: spiel^V+e	-> spiele, *spile
.o.    e (->) 0 ||  \[i|e] _ [l|r] %^V MBD e (%^ElV) .#. 
.o.    e -> 0	|| \[i|e] e [l|r] %^V MBD _ (s) t 
.o.    [%^V] -> 0 

# e insertion
## find^+^InsEt		-> findet
## find^+^InsEst	-> findest, ?findst
## arbeit^+^InsEt	-> arbeitet
## arbeit^+^InsEst	-> arbeitest, *arbeitst
## atm^+^InsEt		-> atmet, *atmt
## fand^+^InsE2t	-> fandet
## fand^+^InsE2st	-> fandest, ?fandst
## fuhr^+^InsE2t	-> fuhrt, fuhret
## fuhr^+^InsE2st	-> fuhrst, fuhrest
.o.	[ %^InsE | %^InsE2 ] -> e || [ NCons | t ] MBD _
.o.	[ %^InsE | %^InsE2 ] -> e || d MBD _ t
.o.	%^InsE (->) e || d MBD _ s t
.o.	%^InsE -> 0
.o.	%^InsE2 -> [e|0] 

# imperative "e"
## atm^+^ImpE		-> atme
## arbeit^+^ImpE	-> arbeite, *arbeit
## komm^+^ImpE		-> komm, komme
## schrei^+ImpE		-> schrei, ?schreie
.o.	%^ImpE -> e	|| [ NCons | d | t ] MBD _
.o.	%^ImpE -> [e|0]	

# 2nd person singular after "s"
## (du) läss^+st	-> lasst
## (du) weiß^+st	-> weißt 
## (du) sitz^+st	 -> sitzt
.o.	s -> 0	|| [ s | ß | x | z ] MBD _ t

## hält^+t -> hält
.o.	t -> 0		|| _ MBD t
];

echo >>> adjectives ...
define LEX
read regex [
	LEX
# adjectives in -el, -er
## teuer^+^AdjE		-> teure, ?teuere
## sauer^+^AdjE		-> saure, ?sauere
## finster^+^AdjE	-> finstere, finstre
## penibel^+^AdjE	-> penible, *penibele
## dunkel^+^AdjEn	-> dunklen, ?dunkeln
## dunkel^+^AdjEm	-> dunklem, *dunkelm
## inner^+^AdjEn	-> inneren, innern, ?innren
## unser^+AdjEtwillen	-> unseretwillen, unsertwillen, unsretwillen
## BUT: leer^+^AdjE	-> leere, *lere
## BUT: stier^+^AdjE	-> stiere, *stire
.o.	%^AdjE (->) 0	|| [%^AdjE|e] l MBD _ n
.o.	e -> 0		|| \[i|e] _ l MBD %^AdjE 
.o.	[ %^AdjE|e] (->) 0	|| \[i|e] _ r MBD %^AdjE
.o.	%^AdjE (->) 0	|| [%^AdjE|e] r MBD _ [n|m|t]
.o.	%^AdjE -> e

# superlative -(e)st
## klein^+^SupEste	-> kleinste
## heiß^+^SupEste	-> heißeste
## kalt^$^+SupEste	-> kälteste, ?kältste
## wild^+SupEste	-> wildeste, wildste
## neu^+SupEste		-> neueste, neuste
## roh^+SupEste		-> roheste, rohste
## reich^+SupEste	-> reichste, ?reicheste
## informativ^+SupEste	-> informativste, ?informativeste
## hydrophob^+SupEste	-> hydrophobste, ?hydrophobeste
.o.	%^SupE -> e   || [ s (DBL) | ß | x | z ] MBD _	
.o.	%^SupE -> 0   || e MBD _	
.o.	%^SupE (->) e || [ d | t | Vowel [Vowel|h] | c h 
			 | i v | o b ] MBD _ 
.o.	%^SupE -> 0 
];

echo >>> nouns, function words, ...
define LEX

read regex [
	LEX
# genitive or compound
# Mann^+^OptEs		-> Mannes, Manns
# Mann^/^OptEs		-> Mannes-, Manns-
# Haus^+^OptEs		-> Hauses, *Hauss
.o.	%^OptE -> e	|| [ s (DBL) | ß | x | z ] [MBD|FBD] _ s
.o.	%^OptE -> 0	|| e [MBD|FBD] _ s
.o.	%^OptE -> [e|0]	 

## Bus^~^+e		-> Busse
.o.	DBL -> s	|| s _ [MBD|FBD] Vowel

## Freundin^~^+en	-> Freundinnen
.o.	DBL -> n	|| n _ MBD Vowel

## an^+m       -> am
## vieles^+m   -> vielem
.o. [s|n] -> 0 || _ MBD m
];


set quit-on-fail off
substitute label e for %^OptE:e 
substitute label 0 for %^OptE:0
substitute label 0 for %^CpdE:0 
set quit-on-fail on
